Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-767
Dissolution of districts; resolution; notice; outstanding indebtedness, effect; hearing; filing.

Whenever a majority of the board of trustees or the administrator of any sanitary and improvement district organized under the provisions of Chapter 31, article 7, and amendments thereto, shall desire that the district shall be wholly dissolved, the trustees or administrator shall first propose a resolution declaring the advisability of such dissolution and setting out verbatim the terms and conditions thereof, and also setting out the time and place when the board of trustees or administrator shall meet to consider the adoption of such resolution. Notice of the time and place when the resolution shall be set for consideration shall be published the same day each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county where the district was organized, which publication shall contain the entire wording of the proposed resolution. If any part of the district lies within the area of the jurisdiction of any municipality, then the trustees or administrator shall mail a copy of such proposed resolution to such municipality within five days after the date of first publication of the resolution. The last publication shall be not less than five days nor more than two weeks prior to the time set for hearing on objections to the passage of the resolution, at which hearing the owners of property within the district, or any municipality if any part of such district lies within the area of its zoning jurisdiction, may appear and make objections to the proposed resolution. If the owners representing a majority of the area of real estate within the district fail to sign and present to the board or to the administrator, on or prior to the hearing date, a written petition opposing the resolution, then a majority of the board of trustees or the administrator may pass the resolution and thereby adopt the proposed dissolution; Provided, that no such resolution shall be adopted if the district is then obligated on any outstanding bonds, warrants, or other debts or obligations unless the holders of such bonds, warrants, or other debts or obligations shall all sign written consents to the dissolution prior to the adoption of the resolution of dissolution. If the petition opposing such resolution is signed by property owners representing a majority of the area of real estate within the district and presented to the board of trustees or the administrator on or prior to the hearing date, then the board of trustees or the administrator shall not adopt such resolution. After the board of trustees or the administrator has adopted such resolution of dissolution, the clerk of the district shall prepare and file a certified copy of the resolution of dissolution in the office of the county clerk where the original articles of association were filed and in the office of the Secretary of State.

Laws 1967, c. 186, § 1, p. 507;

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 29.